Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska18-1755
Acquisition of real property; procedure; public right of access for recreational use.

A city or village acquiring an interest in real property by purchase or eminent domain shall do so only after the governing body of such city or village has authorized the acquisition by action taken in a public meeting after notice and public hearing. The city or village shall provide to the public a right of access for recreational use to the real property acquired for public recreational purposes. Such access shall be at designated access points and shall be equal to the right of access for recreational use held by adjacent landowners. The right of access granted to the public for recreational use shall meet or exceed such right held by a private landowner adjacent to the real property.

Laws 1994, LB 188, § 3;

Laws 1994, LB 441, § 1;

Laws 2006, LB 1113, § 18;

Laws 2021, LB163, § 116.